Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2462
Power project agency; receivership; when authorized; lease or alienation to private person; prohibited.

The board of directors of any agency issuing revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness under sections 18-2461 to 18-2480 is hereby authorized and empowered to agree and contract with the purchasers or holders thereof that in the event of default in the payment of interest on, or principal of, any such revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, issued, or in the event of default in the performance of any duty or obligation under any agreement by such agency, the holder or holders of such revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness then outstanding, shall be entitled as a matter of right, upon application to a court of competent jurisdiction, to have appointed a receiver of the business and property of the agency including all tolls, rents, revenue, issues, income, receipts, profits, benefits, and additions derived, received, or had thereof or therefrom, with power to operate and maintain such business and property, collect, receive, and apply all revenue, income, profits, and receipts arising therefrom, and prescribe rates, tolls, and charges, in the same way and manner as the agency might do. Whenever all defaults in the payment of principal of, and interest on, such revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, and any other defaults under any agreement made by the agency, shall have been made good, such receiver shall be discharged by the court and shall therefor surrender control of the business and possession of the property in his or her hands to the agency. An agency created under sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall never lease or alienate the franchises, plant, or physical equipment of the agency to any private person, firm, association, or corporation for operating, or for any other purpose, except as specifically provided in sections 18-2452 to 18-2462.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 62.